Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201419-922
Legislative body of municipality;
adopt building regulations; publish; reference to existing codes; ordinances
open to public; ordinances to apply to entire municipal area.

The legislative body of any city of
the first or second class or any village may adopt by ordinance,
which shall have the force and effect of law, the conditions, provisions,
limitations, and terms of a building code, a plumbing code, an electrical
code, a fire prevention code, or any other code relating to building or relating
to the erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair, conversion,
maintenance, placing, or using of any building, structure, automobile trailer,
house trailer, or cabin trailer. The local legislative body shall, before
such ordinance takes effect, cause such ordinance setting forth the code to
be published one time in book or pamphlet form or in a legal newspaper published
in and of general circulation in the municipality or, if none is published
in the municipality, in a legal newspaper of general circulation in the municipality.
The legislative body may by ordinance, which shall have the force and effect
of law, amend such code so adopted.

For this
purpose, the local legislative body may adopt any standard code which contains
rules or regulations printed as a code in book or pamphlet form, by reference
to such code, or portions thereof, alone without setting forth in such ordinance
the conditions, provisions, limitations, or terms of such code. When such
code or any such standard code, or portion thereof, shall be incorporated
by reference into any ordinance pursuant to this section, it shall have the
same force and effect as though it has been spread at large in such ordinance
without further or additional publication. At least one copy of such code
or such standard code, or portion thereof, shall be filed for use and examination
by the public in the office of the clerk of such municipality prior to its
adoption.

Any code
adopted and approved by the local legislative body as provided in this section
and the building permit requirements or occupancy permit requirements imposed
by any such code or by section 19-913 shall apply to all of the city or village
and within the unincorporated area where a city or village has been granted
zoning jurisdiction and is exercising such jurisdiction.

Laws 1975, LB 410, § 8;

Laws 1986, LB 960, § 12;

Laws 1987, LB 483, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB802, § 1.
July 18, 2014